District of Columbia statutes.
34-1313.16

Expedition.

The Commission shall expedite its consideration of applications pursuant to §§ 34-1313.12 and 34-1313.13. In proceedings to consider the applications, the Commission’s decision shall be issued no later than 120 days of the close of the period for public comment upon the application; provided, that if a protest or objection to the application is timely filed with the Commission, the period for the Commission’s decision is extended by 45 days. When calculating the time required to issue its decision, the Commission may omit any time interval for which it has determined the application to be deficient and in which a formal request for material to cure that deficiency was pending.

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 316, 61 DCR 1882